Maryland, session 2026, SB0736.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
11–208.
(a) (1) In this section, “indistinguishable from an actual and identifiable child”
means an ordinary person would conclude that the image is of an actual and identifiable
minor.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0736*

SENATE BILL 736
(2) “Indistinguishable from an actual and identifiable child” includes a
computer–generated image that has been created, adapted, or modified to appear as an
actual and identifiable child.
(3) “Indistinguishable from an actual and identifiable child” does not
include images or items depicting minors that are:
(i) drawings;
(ii) cartoons;
(iii) sculptures; or
(iv) paintings.
(b) (1) A person may not knowingly possess and intentionally retain a film,
videotape, photograph, or other visual representation showing an actual child or a
computer–generated image that is indistinguishable from an actual and identifiable child
under the age of [16] 18 years:
(i) engaged as a subject of sadomasochistic abuse;
(ii) engaged in sexual conduct; or
(iii) in a state of sexual excitement.
(2) A person may not knowingly or intentionally access and intentionally
view a film, videotape, photograph, or other visual representation showing an actual child
or a computer–generated image that is indistinguishable from an actual and identifiable
child under the age of [16] 18 years:
(i) engaged as a subject of sadomasochistic abuse;
(ii) engaged in sexual conduct; or
(iii) in a state of sexual excitement.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a person who
violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to imprisonment
not exceeding [5] 10 years or a fine not exceeding [$2,500] $25,000 or both.
(2) A person who violates this section, having previously been convicted
under this section, is guilty of a felony and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not
exceeding [10] 20 years or a fine not exceeding [$10,000] $50,000 or both.

SENATE BILL 736 3
(d) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit a parent from possessing
visual representations of the parent’s own child in the nude unless the visual
representations show the child engaged:
(1) as a subject of sadomasochistic abuse; or
(2) in sexual conduct and in a state of sexual excitement.
(e) It is an affirmative defense to a charge of violating this section that the person
promptly and in good faith:
(1) took reasonable steps to destroy each visual representation; or
(2) reported the matter to a law enforcement agency.
(F) (1) A PERSON DEPICTED IN A VISUAL REPRESENTATION THAT IS
INVOLVED IN A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION IN A COURT
OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION.
(2) IN AN ACTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE COURT MAY AWARD:
(I) ACTUAL DAMAGES;
(II) PUNITIVE DAMAGES NOT EXCEEDING $250,000;
(III) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND COSTS; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER APPROPRIATE RELIEF.
(3) A CONVICTION FOR AN OFFENSE UNDER THIS SECTION IS NOT A
PREREQUISITE FOR MAINTENANCE OF AN ACTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
Article – State Government
6–112.
(A) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THAT:
(1) PROVIDES GUIDANCE TO LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES
REGARDING BEST PRACTICES FOR DETECTING COMPUTER–GENERATED IMAGES IN
VIOLATION OF § 11–208 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;

SENATE BILL 736
(2) DISCUSSES CHANGES TO TECHNOLOGY THAT AFFECT
ENFORCEMENT OF § 11–208 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
(3) INCLUDES DATA ON CHARGES AND PROSECUTIONS UNDER §
11–208 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE DURING THE PRIOR 1–YEAR PERIOD; AND
(4) IS PUBLICLY AVAILABLE ON THE ATTORNEY GENERAL’S WEBSITE.
(B) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY PARTNER WITH OTHER STATE
AGENCIES OR ANOTHER ORGANIZATION TO COMPLETE THE REPORT REQUIRED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.